csv2yaml/yaml_output/VII_Cnj_V.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: dakaagamisinog
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: inamosinog
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: dakaagamig
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: inamog
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
